Colorado, session 2026A, HB1057.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-213, amend
(1)(b)(II)(B), (1)(b)(II)(J), (5)(a)(I), and (5)(c); and add (1)(i) as follows:
42-3-213. License plates - military veterans - rules -
retirement.
(1) (b) (II) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section:
(B) No fee THE DEPARTMENT shall be charged NOT CHARGE A FEE
for one set of disabled veteran license plates issued under subsection (5)
of this section for a passenger car, truck, motorcycle, or noncommercial
or recreational vehicle OR A PLATE ISSUED IN LIEU OF A DISABLED
VETERAN LICENSE PLATE UNDER SUBSECTION (1)(i) OF THIS SECTION. FOR
THE ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF A PLATE NOT ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CHARGE THE FEES IMPOSED FOR THE ISSUANCE
OR RENEWAL OF A LICENSE PLATE THAT EXCEED THE FEES THAT WOULD BE
CHARGED FOR THE ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF A STANDARDIZED LICENSE
PLATE UNDER SECTION 42-3-203.
(J) The department shall not charge a fee for one set of disabled
woman veteran license plates issued under subsection (32) of this section
for a passenger car, truck, motorcycle, or noncommercial or recreational
vehicle OR A PLATE ISSUED IN LIEU OF A DISABLED WOMAN VETERAN
LICENSE PLATE UNDER SUBSECTION (1)(i) OF THIS SECTION. FOR THE
ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF A PLATE NOT ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
-2- HB26-1057

DEPARTMENT SHALL CHARGE THE FEES IMPOSED FOR THE ISSUANCE OR
RENEWAL OF A LICENSE PLATE THAT EXCEED THE FEES THAT WOULD BE
CHARGED FOR THE ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF A STANDARDIZED LICENSE
PLATE UNDER SECTION 42-3-203.
(i) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO QUALIFIES TO NOT PAY FEES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 42-3-304 (3)(a) MAY ELECT TO BE ISSUED
ANOTHER LICENSE PLATE IN LIEU OF BEING ISSUED A DISABLED VETERAN
LICENSE PLATE UNDER SUBSECTION (5) OF THIS SECTION OR A UNITED
STATES DISABLED WOMAN VETERAN LICENSE PLATE UNDER SUBSECTION
(32) OF THIS SECTION IF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS DESCRIBED IN THE
SECTION ESTABLISHING THE LICENSE PLATE BEING ISSUED; AND
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL PAYS THE ADDITIONAL FEES FOR THE LICENSE
PLATE AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(b)(II)(B) OR (1)(b)(II)(J) OF THIS
SECTION.
(5) Disabled veterans.
(a) (I) The disabled veteran license plate shall MUST indicate that
the owner of the motor vehicle to which the license plate is attached is a
disabled veteran of the United States armed forces AND IS DISABLED.
(c) License plates qualifying for the exemption granted in
sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection
(1) SUBSECTION (1)(b)(II)(B) of this section shall be issued only by the
department and shall MAY bear the inscription "D.V." and a separate
number series shall be used for such license plates. Additional license
plates bearing such inscription may be issued by the department to THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL CHARGE eligible persons upon the payment of any
fees or taxes required by this article ARTICLE 3 FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A
-3- HB26-1057

SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT DISABLED VETERAN LICENSE PLATE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-304, amend (3)
introductory portion and (3)(a) as follows:
42-3-304. Registration fees - passenger-mile taxes - clean
screen fund - fees - report - rules - definitions - repeal.
(3) No fee is payable THE OWNER NEED NOT PAY THE TAXES AND
FEES for the annual registration of a vehicle when:
(a) The owner of the vehicle is a veteran who in an application for
registration shows that the owner has established such owner's rights to
benefits under the provisions of Pub.L. 79-663, as amended, and Pub.L.
82-187, as amended 38 U.S.C. SEC. 3901 ET SEQ., or is a veteran of the
armed forces of the United States who incurred a disability and who is,
at the date of application, receiving compensation from the veterans
administration or any branch of the armed forces of the United States for
a fifty percent or more, service-connected disability, or for loss of use of
one or both feet or one or both hands, or for permanent impairment or
loss of vision in both eyes that constitutes virtual or actual blindness. The
exemption provided in this subsection (3)(a):
(I) DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(A) COMMERCIAL VEHICLES;
(B) IMPLEMENTS OF HUSBANDRY; OR
(C) A TRUCK OR TRUCK TRACTOR REGISTERED TO BE TAXED
UNDER SECTION 42-3-306 (4);
(II) APPLIES ONLY TO INDIVIDUALS; AND
(III) Applies to the original qualifying vehicle and to any vehicle
subsequently purchased and owned by the same veteran but does not
apply to more than one vehicle at a time.
-4- HB26-1057

SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to vehicles registered on or after the
applicable effective date of this act.
-5- HB26-1057